Utah statutes.
73-15-3.   Cloud seeding to increase precipitation -- Control of Division of Water Resources -- Powers and authority of division -- "Cloud seeding" and "cloud-seeding project" defined.

The state of Utah through the Division of Water Resources shall be the only entity, private or public, that shall have authority to authorize cloud-seeding research, evaluation, or implementation projects to alter precipitation, cloud forms, or meteorological parameters within the state of Utah, except cloud seeding for the suppression of fog; and frost prevention measures for the protection of orchards and crops are excluded from the coverage of this act. The Division of Water Resources shall authorize and may sponsor or develop local or state-wide cloud-seeding projects that conform to over-all state water planning objectives and are determined to be feasible by the Division of Water Resources. The Division of Water Resources may contract with the Utah water research laboratory or any other individual or organization for consultation and/or assistance in developing cloud-seeding projects or in furthering necessary research of cloud seeding or other factors that may be affected by cloud-seeding activities. Cloud seeding as used in this act shall be construed to mean all acts undertaken to artificially distribute or create nuclei in cloud masses for the purposes of altering precipitation, cloud forms, or other meteorological parameters. A cloud-seeding project as used in this act shall be a planned project to evaluate meteorological conditions, perform cloud seeding, and evaluate results.



Amended by Chapter 250, 1979 General Session

